Tennessee, session 114, HB2650.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. For the purpose of providing an efficient system of roads, highways, and
bridges and the building, construction, reconstruction, maintenance and repair of roads,
highways, and bridges in Obion County, Tennessee, the office of County Road Superintendent
is hereby created. The County Road Superintendent shall be deemed to be the chief
administrative officer of the highway department, which builds and maintains the roads of the
county in accordance with the County Uniform Highway Law, codified at Tennessee Code
Annotated, Title 54, Chapter 7, Parts 1 and 2, as amended from time to time.
SECTION 2. The County Road Superintendent in office on the effective date of this act
shall continue to serve until the expiration of the superintendent's term. After the expiration of
the current County Road Superintendent's term, the County Road Superintendent shall be
selected by a majority vote of the entire membership of the county legislative body for a term of
four (4) years, commencing July 1, 2027, and every four (4) years thereafter. The County Road
Superintendent shall have the qualifications, term of office, duties, powers, authority and
minimum compensation as provided by the Tennessee County Uniform Highway Law currently
and as such law might be amended in the future, and shall be subject to the same limitations,
conditions, prohibitions and punishments as provided in the Tennessee County Uniform
Highway Law, now and in the future.
SECTION 3. The County Road Superintendent shall be the purchasing agent tor the
highway department and as such is responsible for all purchases of the department, for
proposing a budget for the department, and for maintaining the inventory of the department. In
performing these duties, the County Road Superintendent shall conform to all appropriate
HB2650
012679
- 1 -

provisions of state law, including the Tennessee County Uniform Highway Law, and to
appropriate local acts or resolutions. Should Obion County in the future adopt some form of
centralized purchasing pursuant to a local option general law or private act, the provisions of
this act as they relate to purchasing by the highway department shall be superseded by such
act.
SECTION 4. The county Road Superintendent shall have the authority to make
expenditures from the highway fund and to issue warrants drawn against the road fund of Obion
County under his signature. A second signature from that of the County Mayor is also required.
All expenditures shall conform to the budget of the Obion County Highway Department as
approved by the County Legislative Body.
SECTION 5. The Obion County Legislative Body may, in accordance with its own
bylaws and rules, establish an advisory committee of the County Legislative Body to provide
recommendations to the County Road Superintendent on the needs of the county.
SECTION 6. All laws or parts of laws in conflict herewith are hereby repealed. If any
provision of this or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such
invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect
without the invalid provision or application, and to that end the provisions of this act are declared
to be severable.
SECTION 7. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of Obion County. Its approval or non-approval shall be proclaimed by the
presiding officer of the county legislative body and certified to the Secretary of State.
SECTION 8. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 7.
- 2 - 012679